Mississippi, session 2026, HB1128.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Defend DeSoto County Act". SECTION 2. The Mississippi Department of Transportation is authorized to identify, fund and improve strategic entry points into DeSoto County, Mississippi, in order to enhance traffic safety and support local law enforcement operations.  The Mississippi Department of Transportation may take necessary actions related to collection and coordination of data with municipal police departments and county sheriff departments in order to carry out the purposes of this section. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.